Louisiana, session 2026, SB169.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1028.5(D) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 22:1028.5(F)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1028.5. Required coverage for biomarker testing
* * *
D.(1) A health coverage plan shall ensure that the coverage prescribed in
Subsection B of this Section is provided in a manner that limits disruptions in care,
including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen samples.
(2) Coverage required under Subsection B of this Section shall apply to
the covered biomarker test itself and shall not be conditioned on laboratory
classifications or credentialing standards unrelated to the performance of the
covered test.
* * *
F. To the extent there is a conflict between the provisions of this Section
and R.S. 22:1028.3, the provisions of this Section shall prevail.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 169 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.